Alabama, session 2026rs, SB18.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-26A-2.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§40-26A-2.1
(a) There is levied on every person engaged in the
Page 1

(a) There is levied on every person engaged in the
SB18 INTRODUCED
business of managing or facilitating pari-mutuel wagering on
historical horse racing a state privilege tax of four percent
of the person's net gambling revenue. The tax shall be
collected by the Department of Revenue.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), "net gambling
revenue" means the total amount of money or value in any form
received as a result of any pari-mutuel wagering on historical
horse racing activities, excluding free bets, free plays, and
promotional credits, less federal excise taxes, voided wagers,
and the total money or value in any form paid as prizes or
winnings.
(c) The state privilege tax levied under this section
is exclusive of and supersedes any other state taxes now
imposed on historical horse racing pari-mutuel activities,
including but not limited to the state privilege tax imposed
by Section 40-26A-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Nothing in this section shall change the existing
state tax structure for live greyhound and thoroughbred racing
as well as simulcast live greyhound and thoroughbred racing.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize, permit, or expand any form of gambling activity
beyond that which is permitted by law on January 1, 2026.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on the first
day of the second month following its passage and approval by
the Governor or its otherwise becoming law.
Page 2